North Carolina statutes. Chapter 24. Interest.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 24-8.
Loans not in excess of $300,000; what interest, fees and charges permitted.

If the principal amount of a loan is less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000), no lender shall charge or receive from any borrower or require in connection with any loan any borrower, directly or indirectly, to pay, deliver, transfer, or convey or otherwise confer upon or for the benefit of the lender or any other person, firm, or corporation any sum of money, thing of value, or other consideration other than that which is pledged as security or collateral to secure the repayment of the full principal of the loan, together with fees and interest provided for in this Chapter or Chapter 53 of the General Statutes.

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-401, s. 2, effective October 1, 2003, and applicable to contracts entered into or renewed on or after that date.

The provisions of this section shall not prevent a borrower from selling, transferring, or conveying property other than security or collateral to any person, firm, or corporation for a fair consideration so long as such transaction is not made a condition or requirement for any loan.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of State law, any lender may collect money from the borrower for the payment of (i) bona fide loan-related goods, products, and services provided or to be provided by third parties, (ii) taxes, filing fees, recording fees, and other charges and fees paid or to be paid to public officials, and (iii) fees payable to the federal government, any state or local government or any federal, state, or local governmental agency in connection with a loan made pursuant to a loan program sponsored by or offered through the federal government, any state or local government or any federal, state or local government agency, including loan guarantee and tax credit programs. No third party shall charge or receive (i) any unreasonable compensation for loan-related goods, products, and services, or (ii) any compensation for which no loan-related goods and products are provided or for which no or only nominal loan-related services are performed. Loan-related goods, products, and services include fees for tax payment services, fees for flood certification, fees for pest-infestation determinations, mortgage brokers’ fees, appraisal fees, inspection fees, environmental assessment fees, fees for credit report services, assessments, costs of upkeep, surveys, attorneys’ fees, notary fees, escrow charges, and insurance premiums (including, for example, fire, title, life, accident and health, disability, unemployment, flood, and mortgage insurance).

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of State law, any lender may receive the proceeds from any insurance policies where loss occurs under the terms of such policies.

This section shall not be applicable to any corporation licensed as a “Small Business Investment Company” under the provisions of the United States Code Annotated, Title 15, section 66, et seq., nor shall it be applicable to the sale or purchase of convertible debentures, nor to the sale or purchase of any debt security with accompanying warrants, nor to the sale or purchase of other securities through an organized securities exchange.

History.

1961, c. 1142; 1969, c. 127; c. 1303, s. 5; 1993, c. 226, s. 12; 1999-332, s. 4; 2000-140, s. 40(c); 2003-401, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on usury law in North Carolina, see 47 N.C.L. Rev. 761 (1969).

For comment on equity participation (a device to circumvent usury laws) in real estate finance, see 7 N.C. Cent. L.J. 387 (1976).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2003-401, s. 2, effective October 1, 2003, and applicable to contracts entered into or renewed on or after that date, repealed subsection (b).

§ 24-9.
Loans exempt from rate and fee limitations.

As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

“Bank” means a bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union chartered under the laws of North Carolina or the United States. However, the term “bank” does not include any subsidiary or affiliate of a bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union chartered under the laws of North Carolina or the United States that is not itself a bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union chartered under the laws of North Carolina or the United States.

“Equity line of credit” means a loan, other than an exempt loan, that satisfies all of the following conditions:

The lender is a bank.

The loan is a revolving line of credit, open-end loan, revolving credit plan, or revolving credit card plan, and the loan is secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on real property.

At any time within a specified period not to exceed 30 years the borrower may request and the lender is obligated to provide credit advances up to the agreed aggregate credit limit. As used in this sub-subdivision, “lender is obligated” means that the lender is contractually bound to provide credit advances. However, the equity line of credit and the lender’s obligation to make credit advances shall be subject to the provisions of section 226.5b(f) of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations and the official commentaries and rulings issued pursuant thereto, as the same may be amended from time to time, without regard to whether that section of the Code of Federal Regulations would otherwise apply to the loan.

Any repayments of principal by the borrower within the specified time will reduce the amount of advances counted against the aggregate credit limit.

The initial loan amount is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more. On January 1, 2008, and on January 1 every five years thereafter, the minimum initial loan amount sufficient to qualify a loan closed on or after that date as an equity line of credit under this section shall be increased by one thousand dollars ($1,000). For example, a loan closed on or after January 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2013, shall not be considered an equity line of credit unless the initial loan amount is eleven thousand dollars ($11,000) or more, and a loan closed on or after January 1, 2013, but prior to January 1, 2018, shall not be considered an equity line of credit unless the initial loan amount is twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) or more.An equity line of credit shall cease being an equity line of credit subject to the provisions of this section from and after the date the loan amount is reduced below the equity line of credit’s initial loan amount unless (i) the loan amount was reduced for one or more of the reasons or pursuant to one or more of the methods specified in section 226.5b(f)(2) or section 226.5b(f)(3)(vi) of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations and the official commentaries and rulings issued pursuant thereto, as the same may be amended from time to time, without regard to whether that section of the Code of Federal Regulations would otherwise apply to the loan, or (ii) the loan amount was reduced at the request of the borrower because the borrower was engaged in the refinancing of a loan secured by a superior lien on the same real property and the reduction in the loan amount of the equity line of credit is no greater than the difference between the loan amount secured by the refinancing mortgage and the outstanding principle balance of the loan being refinanced.

“Exempt loan” means a loan in which:

The loan amount is three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) or more; or

The borrower is a person other than a natural person; or

The loan is obtained by a natural person primarily for a purpose other than a personal, family, or household purpose. Whether a loan is obtained primarily for a purpose other than a personal, family, or household purpose shall be guided by the standards established by the federal Truth In Lending Act (Title 1 of Public Law 90-321; 82 Stat. 146; 15 U.S.C. § 160, et seq.) and all regulations and rulings issued pursuant to that Act, as the same may be amended from time to time.

“Loan” means an advance of money or an extension of credit that is made to or on behalf of a borrower, the principal amount of which the borrower has an obligation to pay the lender. The term includes revolving lines of credit, open-end loans, revolving credit plans, and revolving credit card plans in addition to closed-end loans.

“Loan amount” means the principal amount of a loan or, in the case of a revolving line of credit, open-end loan, revolving credit plan, or revolving credit card plan, the initial maximum credit limit.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter or any other provision of State law, any borrower in an exempt loan transaction may agree to pay, and any lender, including a bank, may charge and collect from the borrower, interest at any rate and fees and other charges in any amount that the borrower agrees to pay. A claim or defense of usury is prohibited in an exempt loan transaction.

The provisions of

G.S. 24-1.2

A, 24-11, and 24-11.1 shall not apply to equity lines of credit offered by banks. Except as provided in this subsection and notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter or any other provision of State law, any bank may charge and collect from any borrower interest at any rate and fees and other charges in any amount that the borrower agrees to pay in connection with an equity line of credit. However, an equity line of credit made by a bank shall be subject to the following, to the extent otherwise applicable:

The provisions of

G.S. 24-1.1

E (relating to restrictions and limitations on high-cost home loans).

The provisions of

G.S. 24-10.2

(relating to consumer protections in certain home loans).

Notwithstanding the limitation against prepayment penalties contained in

G.S. 45-82.4

, a bank may charge and collect prepayment fees or penalties following the borrower’s voluntary exercise of a right or option to repay all or any portion of the outstanding balance of a variable interest rate equity line of credit at a fixed interest rate over a specified period of time, subject to the following limitations:

Prepayment fees or penalties may be charged only with respect to the prepayment of that portion of the outstanding balance the borrower voluntarily agrees to repay at a fixed interest rate over a specified time;

No prepayment fees or penalties may be charged for prepayments made more than 30 months after the borrower voluntarily exercises the right or option to repay that portion of the outstanding balance of the equity line of credit at a fixed interest rate over a specified period of time; and

The prepayment fees or penalties charged with respect to that portion of the outstanding balance to be repaid at a fixed rate over a specified period of time may not exceed, in the aggregate, more than two percent (2%) of the amount prepaid.Otherwise, no prepayment fees or penalties may be charged or collected by the bank with respect to an equity line of credit.

The provisions of

G.S. 24-11

and

G.S. 24-11

.1 shall not apply to revolving credit card plans offered by banks. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter or any other provision of State law, any bank may charge and collect from any borrower interest at any rate, as well as fees and other charges in any amount that the borrower agrees to pay in connection with a revolving credit card plan. This subsection (d) shall not apply to a revolving credit card plan that is secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on real property.

History.

1963, c. 753, s. 1; 1965, c. 335; 1969, c. 896; 1979, c. 138, s. 5; 1995, c. 351, s. 13; 2003-401, s. 1; 2011-312, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2003-401, s. 1, effective October 1, 2003, and applicable to contracts entered into or renewed on or after that date, rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2011-312, s. 1, effective October 1, 2011, updated the section reference in subdivision (c)(3).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on usury law in North Carolina, see 47 N.C.L. Rev. 761 (1969).

§ 24-9.1.
Certain repayments to consumers by public utilities not subject to claim or defense of usury.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter or any other provision of law, any public utility, as defined by

G.S. 62-3

, shall pay to its customers such rate of interest as may be required by order of the North Carolina Utilities Commission in transactions wherein the utility is refunding to its customers funds advanced by or overcollected from the customers. As to such transactions, the claim or defense of usury by such public utility and its successors or anyone else in its behalf is prohibited.

History.

1981, c. 461, s. 3.

§ 24-9.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 351, s. 14.

§ 24-9.3.
Economic development loans.

Fees or other funds paid by borrowers for contribution to loss reserve accounts administered and controlled by nonprofit corporations that are part of State-funded programs that provide loans to promote economic development shall not be considered interest under this Chapter and shall not be subject to claims or defenses of usury.

History.

1995, c. 252, s. 1.

§ 24-10.
Maximum fees on loans secured by real property.

No lender on loans made under

G.S. 24-1.1

shall charge or receive from any borrower or any agent for a borrower, any fees or discounts unless otherwise allowed where the principal amount is less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) and is secured by real property, which fees or discounts in the aggregate shall exceed two percent (2%) if a construction loan on other than a one or two family dwelling, and one percent (1%) on any other type of loan; provided, however, if a single lender makes both the construction loan and a permanent loan utilizing one note, the lender may collect the fees as if they were two separate loans. Except as provided herein or otherwise allowed, no party shall pay for the benefit of the lender any other fees or discounts.

Any loan made under

G.S. 24-1.1

in an original principal amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) or less may be prepaid in part or in full, after 30 days notice to the lender, with a maximum prepayment fee of two percent (2%) of the outstanding balance at any time within three years after the first payment of principal and thereafter there shall be no prepayment fee, provided that there shall be no prepayment fee charged or received in connection with any repayment of a construction loan; and except as herein provided, any lender and any borrower may agree on any terms as to prepayment of a loan.

“Construction loan” means a loan which is obtained for the purpose of financing fully, or in part, the cost of constructing buildings or other improvements upon real property and the proceeds of which, under the terms of a written contract between a lender and a borrower, are to be disbursed periodically as the construction work progresses. A construction loan shall be payable in full not later than 18 months in case of a loan made under the provisions of G.S. 24-1.1(a)(1) or 36 months in case of any other construction loan made after the execution of the note by the borrower. A construction loan may include advances for the purchase price of the property upon which the improvements are to be constructed.

Any lender may charge to any person, firm or corporation that assumes a loan, secured by real property, the following fee:

Where the mortgage or deed of trust contains a due on sale clause, a fee not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400.00); provided, however, that if the original obligor is not released from liability on the obligation, the fee shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00).

Where the mortgage or deed of trust does not contain a due on sale clause, a fee not to exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00).The fees authorized by this subsection may be paid in whole or in part by any party but the total shall not exceed the maximum fees set forth herein.

For purposes of this subsection, the term “due on sale clause” means a contract provision that authorizes a lender to declare immediately due and payable all sums secured by the lender’s security instrument if all or any part of the secured property, or an interest therein, is sold or transferred without the lender’s prior written consent or contrary to the requirements of the mortgage or the deed of trust. For purposes of this subsection, no lender shall exercise its rights under the due on sale clause if prohibited by federal law as of the date of execution of the contract containing the clause.

, (f) Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 755, s. 2.

(g)

Notwithstanding the limitations contained in subsection (a) of this section, a lender described in

G.S. 24-1.1

A(a)(2) may charge or receive from any borrower, or any agent for a borrower, fees or discounts which in the aggregate do not exceed two percent (2%) on loans made under

G.S. 24-1.1

when the loans are secured by a second or junior lien on real property. The fees or discounts are fully earned when the loan is made and are not a prepayment penalty under this Chapter or any other law of this State.

(h)

A bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union, or any subsidiary or affiliate thereof organized under the laws of this State or the United States, may charge a party to a loan secured by real property a reasonable fee as may be agreed upon by the parties for an appraisal performed by an employee of the bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union, or any subsidiary or affiliate thereof.
Upon the request of the borrower, the lender shall provide at no additional charge to the borrower a copy of any appraisal for which the lender has collected a fee under this subsection. Provision of the copy of an appraisal shall not be construed to create or imply any warranty which does not otherwise exist by the lender as to the accuracy of the appraisal.

History.

1967, c. 852, s. 1; 1969, c. 40; c. 1303, s. 6; 1971, c. 1168; 1979, c. 684; c. 849, s. 1; c. 969; 1981, c. 933; 1983, c. 541, s. 1; 1985, c. 154, s. 2; c. 755, s. 2; 1991, c. 506, s. 5; 2018-142, s. 6(a), (b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-142, s. 6(a), (b), effective December 15, 2018, in subsection (c), substituted “the” for “such” twice in subsection (c) and once in subsection (g); substituted “progresses. A construction” for “progresses; and such” following “construction work”; and substituted “G.S. 24-1.1(a)(1)” for “G.S. 24-1.1(1)” following “provisions of”; in subsection (g), deleted “or G.S. 24-1.2(2)” following “under

G.S. 24-1.1

”; and made minor stylistic changes.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on usury law in North Carolina, see 47 N.C.L. Rev. 761 (1969).

For article, “Transferring North Carolina Real Estate Part I: How the Present System Functions,” see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 413 (1971).

For note on the operation of a due-on-sale clause in a deed of trust to allow a lender to exact higher interest rates from the grantee of a mortgagor, see 13 Wake Forest L. Rev. 490 (1977).

§ 24-10.1.
Late fees.

Subject to the limitations contained in subsection (b) of this section, any lender may charge a party to a loan or extension of credit governed by

G.S. 24-1.1

or

G.S. 24-1.1

A a late payment charge as agreed upon by the parties in the loan contract.

All of the following limitations apply to a late payment charge:

A late payment charge shall not exceed any of the following:

The amount disclosed with particularity to the borrower pursuant to the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, Chapter 41 of Title 15 of the United States Code, (Truth in Lending Act) and the regulations adopted under it, if that act applies to the transaction.

For a loan or extension of credit that meets all of the following conditions, the greater of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) or four percent (4%) of the amount of the payment past due:

The loan or extension of credit is made by a bank or savings institution organized under the law of North Carolina or of the United States.

The loan or extension of credit is not secured by real property.

The loan or extension of credit is governed by

G.S. 24-1.1

.

The loan or extension of credit has an original principal balance greater than or equal to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

For any other type of loan or extension of credit governed by

G.S. 24-1.1

or G.S. 24-1.1A, four percent (4%) of the amount of the payment past due.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-10, s. 2, effective April 1, 2019, and applicable to contracts entered into, renewed, or modified on or after that date.

A late payment charge shall not be charged unless one of the following is true:

The payment is 30 days past due or more for a loan on which interest on each installment is paid in advance.

The payment is 15 days past due or more for any other loan.

A late payment charge shall not be charged more than once with respect to a single late payment. If a late payment charge is deducted from a payment made on the contract and the deduction results in a subsequent default on a subsequent payment, no late payment charge shall be imposed for the default. If a late payment charge has been once imposed with respect to a particular late payment, no late payment charge shall be imposed with respect to any future payment that would have been timely and sufficient but for the previous default. However, when a borrower fails to make an installment payment, and the terms of the loan agreement provide that subsequent payments shall first be applied to the past due balance, and the borrower resumes making installment payments but has not paid all past due installments, then the lender may enforce the contract according to its terms, imposing a separate late payment charge for each installment that becomes due until the default is cured.

A late payment charge shall not be charged on any loan that by its terms calls for repayment of the entire balance in a single payment and not for installments of interest or principal and interest.

A late payment charge shall not be charged unless the lender notifies the borrower within 45 days following the date the payment was due that a late payment charge has been imposed for a particular late payment which late payment must be paid unless the borrower can show that the installment was paid in full and on time. No late payment charge shall be collected from any borrower if the borrower informs the lender that non-payment of an installment is in dispute and presents proof of payment within 45 days of receipt of the lender’s notice of the late charge.

The provisions of this subsection apply only to home loans made by lenders described in

G.S. 24-1.1

A(a)(2). Notwithstanding that the note or other loan document sets forth a late payment charge in excess of that permitted in this section, the loan is not unlawful if all of the following are true:

No late fee in excess of those permitted in this section has been assessed or collected by the lender.

One of the following is true:

If the loan is executed on or after July 14, 1993, the lender provides written notice to the borrower within 90 days of the date of execution of the loan documents that the late payment charge with respect to the loan shall be four percent (4%) or less.

If the loan was executed prior to July 14, 1993, the lender provides written notice to the borrower within six months of that date that the late payment charge with respect to the loan shall be four percent (4%) or less.

History.

1985, c. 755, s. 1; 1987, c. 447; 1993, c. 339, s. 1; 2017-102, s. 8; 2019-10, s. 2.

§ 24-10.2.
Consumer protections in certain home loans.

For purposes of this section, the term “consumer home loan” means a loan, including an open-end credit plan but excluding a reverse mortgage transaction, in which (i) the borrower is a natural person, (ii) the debt is incurred by the borrower primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, and (iii) the loan is secured by a mortgage or deed of trust upon real estate upon which there is located or there is to be located a structure or structures designed principally for occupancy of from one to four families which is or will be occupied by the borrower as the borrower’s principal dwelling.

Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 58-57-35(b), it shall be unlawful for any lender in a consumer home loan to finance, directly or indirectly, any credit life, disability, or unemployment insurance, or any other life or health insurance premiums; provided, that insurance premiums calculated and paid on a monthly basis shall not be considered financed by the lender.

No lender may knowingly or intentionally engage in the unfair act or practice of “flipping” a consumer home loan. “Flipping” a consumer loan is the making of a consumer home loan to a borrower which refinances an existing consumer home loan when the new loan does not have reasonable, tangible net benefit to the borrower considering all of the circumstances, including the terms of both the new and refinanced loans, the cost of the new loan, and the borrower’s circumstances. This provision shall apply regardless of whether the interest rate, points, fees, and charges paid or payable by the borrower in connection with the refinancing exceed those thresholds specified in

G.S. 24-1.1

E(a)(6).

No lender shall recommend or encourage default on an existing loan or other debt prior to and in connection with the closing or planned closing of a consumer home loan that refinances all or any portion of such existing loan or debt.

The making of a consumer home loan which violates the provisions of this section is hereby declared usurious in violation of the provisions of this Chapter and unlawful as an unfair or deceptive act or practice in or affecting commerce in violation of the provisions of

G.S. 75-1.1

. The Attorney General, the Commissioner of Banks, or any party to a consumer home loan may enforce the provisions of this section. Any person seeking damages or penalties under the provisions of this section may recover damages under either this Chapter or Chapter 75, but not both.

In any suit instituted by a borrower who alleges that the defendant violated this section, the presiding judge may, in the judge’s discretion, allow reasonable attorneys’ fees to the attorney representing the prevailing party, such attorneys’ fees to be taxed as a part of the court costs and payable by the losing party, upon a finding by the presiding judge that:

The party charged with the violation has willfully engaged in the act or practice, and there was unwarranted refusal by such party to fully resolve the matter which constitutes the basis of such suit; or

The party instituting the action knew, or should have known, that the action was frivolous and malicious.

This section establishes specific consumer protections in consumer home loans in addition to other consumer protections that may be otherwise available by law.

A mortgage broker who brokers a consumer home loan that violates the provisions of this section shall be jointly and severally liable with the lender.

History.

1999-332, s. 5; 2003-401, s. 4; 2007-352, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2003-401, s. 4, effective October 1, 2003, and applicable to contracts entered into or renewed on or after that date, substituted “means a loan, including an open-end credit plan but excluding a reverse mortgage transaction” for “shall mean a loan” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2007-352, s. 5, effective January 1, 2008, added subsection (h).

§ 24-11.
Certain revolving credit charges.

On the extension of credit under an open-end credit or similar plan (including revolving credit card plans, and revolving charge accounts, but excluding any loan made directly by a lender under a check loan, check credit or other such plan) under which no service charge shall be imposed upon the consumer or debtor if the account is paid in full within 25 days from the billing date, but upon which there may be imposed an annual charge not to exceed twenty-four dollars ($24.00), there may be charged and collected interest, finance charges or other fees at a rate in the aggregate not to exceed one and one-half percent (1 1/2%) per month computed on the unpaid portion of the balance of the previous month less payments or credit within the billing cycle or the average daily balance outstanding during the current billing period.

(a1)

If the lender chooses not to impose an annual charge under this section, the lender may impose a service charge not to exceed two dollars ($2.00) per month on the balance of any account which is not paid in full within 25 days from the billing date.

(a2)

No person, firm or corporation may charge a discount or fee in excess of six percent (6%) of the principal amount of the accounts acquired from or through any vendors or others providing services who participate in such plan.

On revolving credit loans (including check loans, check credit or other revolving credit plans whereby a bank, banking institution or other lending agency makes direct loans to a borrower), if agreed to in writing by the borrower, such lender may collect interest and service charges by application of a monthly periodic rate computed on the average daily balance outstanding during the billing period, such rate not to exceed one and one-half percent (11/2%).

Any extension of credit under an open-end or similar plan under which there is charged a monthly periodic rate greater than one and one-quarter percent (1 1/4%) may not be secured by real or personal property or any other thing of value, provided, that this subsection shall not apply to consumer credit sales regulated by Chapter 25A, the Retail Installment Sales Act; provided further, that in any action initiated for the possession of property in which a security interest has been taken, a judgment for the possession thereof shall be restricted to commercial units (as defined in

G.S. 25-2-105(6)

) for which the cash price was one hundred dollars ($100.00) or more.

The term “billing date” shall mean any date selected by the creditor and the bill for the balance of the account must be mailed to the customer at least 14 days prior to the date specified in the statement as being the date by which payment of the new balance must be made in order to avoid the imposition of any finance charge.

(d1)

A lender may charge a party to a loan or extension of credit governed by this section a late payment charge not to exceed five dollars ($5.00) on accounts having an outstanding balance of less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) and ten dollars ($10.00) on accounts having an outstanding balance of one hundred dollars ($100.00) or more, for any payment past due for 30 days or more; provided, in no case shall the late charge exceed the outstanding principal balance. If a late payment charge has been once imposed with respect to a late payment, no late charge shall be imposed with respect to any future payment which would have been timely and sufficient but for the previous default.

An annual or service charge pursuant to this section upon an existing credit card account upon which the charge has not previously been imposed may not be imposed unless the lender has given the cardholder at least 30 days notice of the proposed charge, and has advised the cardholder of his right not to accept the new charge. This notice shall be bold and conspicuous, and shall be on the face of the periodic billing statement or on a separate statement which is clearly noted on the face of the periodic billing statement provided to the cardholder. If the cardholder does not accept the new charge upon an existing credit card account, the lender may require that the cardholder make no further use of the account beyond the 30-day period in order to avoid paying the annual charge, but the cardholder shall be entitled to pay off any remaining balance according to the terms of the credit agreement. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the lender from decreasing any rates or fees to the cardholder forthwith. Should any cardholder within 12 months of the initial imposition of an annual charge rescind his credit card contract and surrender all cards issued under the contract to the lender, he shall be entitled to a prorated refund of the annual fee previously charged, credited to the cardholder’s credit card account.

History.

1967, c. 852, s. 1.1; 1969, c. 1303, s. 7; 1977, c. 148, s. 1; cc. 917, 1108; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1330, s. 3; 1981, c. 844, s. 1; 1983, c. 126, ss. 5, 10; 1991, c. 506, s. 6; c. 761, s. 45; 1995, c. 387, s. 2; 2009-570, s. 27.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-570, s. 27, effective August 28, 2009, substituted “judgment” for “judgement” in subsection (c).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on usury law in North Carolina, see 47 N.C.L. Rev. 761 (1969).

For survey of 1976 case law on insurance, see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 1052 (1977).

For article calling for a comprehensive federal consumer credit code, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1 (1979).

§ 24-11.1.
Disclosure requirements for credit cards.

This section applies to any application, solicitation of an application, offer of credit, or communication extending credit that is:

For an open-end credit plan accessed through a credit card or a revolving credit loan accessed through a credit card;

Printed;

Mailed or otherwise delivered to a person at any address within this State;

Not delivered pursuant to an existing credit agreement; and

Not printed in a newspaper, magazine, or periodical generally circulated outside as well as inside the State.

Disclosures. — The following disclosures shall be clearly and conspicuously made in or with all documents described in subsection (a) of this section:

The annual percentage rate or, if the rate may vary, a statement that it may vary, the circumstances under which the rate may increase, any limitations on the increase, and the effects of the increase on the other terms of the agreement.

The date or occasion upon which the finance charge begins to accrue on a transaction and the duration of any grace period.

Whether an annual fee is charged and the amount of the fee.

Any delinquency charge, late charge, or collection charge which may be assessed for the late payment of any installment, including the terms and conditions for the imposition of such charge.

Federal Requirements. — The form and content of the disclosures described in subsection (b) may be consistent with similar disclosures required by the federal Truth-in-Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq., and Regulation Z, 12 C.R.F. 226. Any amendment to the Act or Regulation that addresses credit card disclosures shall to the extent it covers applications, solicitations, and other communications covered by this section, replace the disclosure requirements of this section for creditors subject to the Act.

Penalty. — A violation of this section shall constitute a violation of

G.S. 75-1.1

except that the creditor shall not be liable for any fine, civil penalty, treble damages, or attorney’s fee where the creditor shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error, notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid any such error.

Severability. — If any part of this section is found unconstitutional or is preempted by federal law with regard to a creditor because the creditor is located outside of the State, that part does not apply to creditors located within the State.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize any fee, charge, surcharge or penalty not otherwise authorized by law.

History.

1987, c. 735, s. 1.

§ 24-11.2.
Disclosure requirements for charge cards.

Applications and Other Communications. — This section applies to any application, solicitation of an application, offer of credit, or communication extending credit that is:

For credit accessed through a charge card;

Printed;

Mailed or otherwise delivered to a person at any address within this State;

Not delivered pursuant to an existing credit agreement; and

Not printed in a newspaper, magazine, or periodical generally circulated outside as well as inside the State.

For purposes of this section, the term “charge card” means any card, plate or other device pursuant to which the charge card issuer extends credit which is not subject to a finance charge and where the charge cardholder cannot automatically access credit that is repayable in installments.

Disclosures. — The following disclosures shall be clearly and conspicuously made in or with all documents described in subsection (a) of this section:

The annual fee and other charges, if any, applicable to the issuance or use of the charge card.

That charges incurred by the use of the charge card are due and payable upon receipt of a periodic statement of charges.

Any delinquency charge, late charge, or collection charge which may be assessed for late payment, including the terms and conditions for the imposition of such charge.

Federal Requirements. — The form and content of the disclosures described in subsection (b) may be consistent with similar disclosures required by the federal Truth-in-Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq., and Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. 226. Any amendment to the Act or Regulation that addresses credit card disclosures shall, to the extent it covers applications, solicitations, and other communications covered by this section, replace the disclosure requirements of this section for creditors subject to the Act.

Penalty. — A violation of this section shall constitute a violation of

G.S. 75-1.1

except that the creditor shall not be liable for any fine, civil penalty, treble damages, or attorney’s fee where the creditor shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error, notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid any such error.

Severability. — If any part of this section is found unconstitutional or is preempted by federal law with regard to a creditor because the creditor is located outside the State, that part does not apply to creditors located within the State.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize any fee, charge, surcharge or penalty not otherwise authorized by law.

History.

1987, c. 735, s. 1.